Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Article 1. In General
§ 30-5-113.
Time within which suit to be brought by person adversely affected; appeals; procedure.

Any person adversely affected by and dissatisfied with any rule, regulation, or order made or issued hereunder, may within ninety (90) days after the entry thereof bring a civil suit or action against the commission or the state oil and gas supervisor or both in the district court of Laramie county, or in the district court of the county in which the complaining person resides, or in the U.S. district court for Wyoming, (if it otherwise has jurisdiction) and not elsewhere, to test the validity of any provision of this act, or rule, regulation, or order, and to secure an injunction and other appropriate relief, including all rights to appeal under applicable rules of civil procedure. Any case on appeal shall have precedence over any other case then pending in such court.

In addition to the foregoing, any person who may feel himself aggrieved by any rule, regulation, order or decision of the commission may have an appeal as provided by law, with respect to appeals from decisions of the board of land commissioners. All proceedings on appeal, except as herein otherwise provided, shall be under the provisions of the code of civil procedure as in other civil cases.

Any person shall have the right to appeal from a decree or judgment of the trial court to the supreme court in accordance with the general laws of this state relating to procedure in appeals in civil cases.

No temporary restraining order or injunction of any kind against the commission or its agents, employees, or representatives, or the attorney general, shall become effective until the plaintiff shall execute a bond in such amount and upon such conditions as the court may direct, and such bond is approved by the judge of the court and filed with the clerk of the court. The bond shall be made payable to the state of Wyoming, and shall be for the use and benefit of all persons who may be injured by the acts done under the protection of the restraining order or injunction, if the rule, regulation or order is upheld. No suit on the bond may be brought after six (6) months from the date of the final determination of the suit in which the restraining order or injunction was issued.

A suit or an appeal involving a test of the validity of any provision of this act, or a rule, regulation, or order shall be advanced for trial and be determined as expeditiously as feasible, and no postponement or continuance thereof shall be granted unless deemed imperative by the court. The court shall consider all the evidence, shall not be bound by any finding of fact or conclusion of law made by the commission, shall hold a trial de novo, shall pass on the credibility of witnesses and the weight to be given to their testimony, and shall determine independently all issues of fact and of law with respect to the validity and reasonableness of the provision, rule, regulation, or order complained of.

No suit, action or other proceeding based upon a violation of this act or any rule, regulation or order of the commission hereunder shall be commenced or maintained unless same shall have been commenced within one (1) year from the date of the alleged violation.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 94, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 30-225; Laws 1965, ch. 174, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to appeals from board of land commissioners, see §§

36-2-201

to

36-2-210

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

30-5-101

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

Jurisdiction.—

Energy company’s bond forfeiture complaint against the Wyoming Oil and Gas Conservation Commission (Commission) was properly dismissed because (1) the company’s only recourse was to timely file a petition for review with a district court within 30 days of the Commission’s order, as the company’s complaint was outside the scope of the statute permitting declaratory judgment complaints in limited circumstances, (2) that statute was not expressly or impliedly repealed, and (3) the company’s complaint was untimely, leaving the district court without jurisdiction.
Black Diamond Energy of Del., Inc. v. Wyo. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 2020 WY 45, 460 P.3d 740,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2020).

§ 30-5-114.
Suits by commission for violation or threatened violation of act; restraining violation; recovery of penalties.

Whenever it appears that any person is violating or threatening to violate any provision of this act or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission, the commission shall bring suit in the name of the state against such person in the district court in the county of the residence of the defendant, or in the county of the residence of any defendant if there be more than one (1) defendant, or in the county where the violation is alleged to have occurred, or is threatened, to restrain such person from continuing such violation or from carrying out the threat of violation. In such suit the commission may seek to recover penalties for violations. Upon the filing of any such suit, summons issued to such person may be directed to the sheriff of any county in this state for service by such sheriff or a deputy. In any such suit, the court may grant injunctions, prohibitory and mandatory, including temporary restraining orders and temporary injunctions. Appeals may be taken from any judgment, decree or order in any such suit as provided in the code of civil procedure and all proceedings in the trial and appellate court shall have precedence over any other proceedings then pending in such courts.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 94, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 30-336.

Cross references. —

For rules of civil procedure governing appeals, see the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

30-5-101

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Law of Oil and Gas in Wyoming: An Overview,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1982).

§ 30-5-115.
Notice of intention and permit required to drill well; fee.

A person desiring to drill a well in search of oil or gas shall notify the commission of such intent on a form prescribed by the commission, and shall pay a fee established by the commission in accordance with W.S. 30-5-104(a) for a permit for each well. Upon receipt of notification and the fee, the commission shall promptly issue such person a permit to drill, unless the drilling of the well is contrary to law, or to a rule, regulation, or order of the commission. The drilling of a well is prohibited until a permit to drill is obtained in accordance with the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 94, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 30-227; 1996, ch. 31, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

30-5-101

.

Applicant must prove operations will be lawful. —

An applicant for a permit to drill bears the burden of proving to the commission that its drilling operations will conform to statutory and regulatory requirements. Gulf Oil Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 693 P.2d 227,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 422

(Wyo. 1985).

There is no law, rule, regulation, or order preventing issuance of the permit.

Marathon Oil Co. v. Pan Am. Petroleum Corp., 473 P.2d 575,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1970).

§ 30-5-116.
Disposition of monies; payment of expenses; charge assessed on value of oil or gas produced.

Civil penalties collected under this act shall be paid to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

. All other monies collected by the commission under the provisions of this act shall be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit in a separate account. Expenses incident to the administration of this act shall include expenses for capital construction and shall be paid out of the account. One half (1/2) of the money so collected may be expended as needed by the commission for capital construction purposes.

There is assessed on the fair cash market value as provided by W.S.

39-14-203

, of all oil and gas produced, sold or transported from the premises in Wyoming a charge not to exceed eight-tenths of one (1) mill ($.0008) on the dollar. The commission shall by order fix the amount of the charge in the first instance and may reduce or increase the amount as the expenses chargeable may require. The amounts fixed by the commission shall not exceed the limit prescribed above. It is the duty of the commission to collect all assessments. All monies collected shall be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit in a separate account and used exclusively to pay the costs and expenses incurred in connection with the administration and enforcement of W.S.

30-5-101

through

30-5-119

. The persons owning a working interest, royalty interest, payments out of production, or any other interest in the oil and gas or in the proceeds thereof, subject to the charge in this subsection are liable for the charge in proportion to their ownership at the time of production. The charge so assessed is payable monthly. The sum due is payable to the commission, on or before the twenty-fifth of the second month following the month in which the charge accrued by the producer on behalf of himself and all other interested persons. If there is a sale of oil or gas within this state the charge is payable by the purchaser. Any charge not paid within the time specified bears interest at the rate of one percent (1%) per month from the date of delinquency until paid. This charge together with the interest is a lien upon the oil or gas against which it is levied and assessed. The person paying the charge as provided is authorized and required to deduct from any amounts due the persons owning an interest in the oil and gas or in the proceeds at the time of production the proportionate amount of the charge before making the payment. Subsection (b) of this section shall apply to all lands in the state of Wyoming, notwithstanding the provisions of W.S.

30-5-118

, however, there is exempted from the charge as levied and assessed the following:

The interest of the United States of America and the interest of the state of Wyoming and the political subdivisions thereof in any oil or gas or in the proceeds thereof;

The interest of any Indian or Indian tribe in any oil or gas or in the proceeds thereof, produced from land subject to the supervision of the United States;

Oil and gas used in producing operations or for repressuring or recycling purposes.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 94, § 11; 1953, ch. 88, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 30-228; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 5; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1981, ch. 19, § 1; 1990, ch. 37, § 1; 1991, ch. 11, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 2005, ch. 63, § 1; ch. 157, § 2; ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “second month following” for “month next following” in (b).

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 157, § 2, in (a), added the first sentence, in the second sentence, inserted “other,” deleted “or as civil penalties” following “commission,” substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked revenue fund,” and made a related change.

Laws 2005, ch. 157, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2005.

The third 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked revenue fund” in (a) and (b).

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments made by all of the 2005 acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

30-5-101

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Cited

in

Kerr-McGee Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 903 P.2d 537,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Mineral Taxation: The Wyoming Problem as Compared with Other Western States,” III Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1968).

§ 30-5-117.
Construction of act generally.

It is not the intent or purpose of this law to require, permit, or authorize the commission or supervisor to prorate or distribute the production of oil and gas among the fields of Wyoming on the basis of market demand. This act shall never be construed to require, permit or authorize the commission, the supervisor, or any court to make, enter or enforce any order, rule, regulation or judgment requiring restriction of production of any pool or of any well except to prevent waste and to protect correlative rights.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 94, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 30-229; Laws 1969, ch. 139, § 2; 1971, ch. 11, § 4.

Meaning of “this law” and “this act.” —

The words “this law” and “this act” refer to ch. 94, Laws 1951. See note to §

30-5-101

.

Conservation measures are permissible. —

The 1971 amendment made it clear that, in order to prevent waste, conservation measures were permissible. Inexco Oil Co. v. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 490 P.2d 1065,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1971).

Commission has the authority to order shut-in production pending successful negotiations

if it believes an allocation formula does not protect correlative rights or otherwise meet statutory criteria. Trout v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 721 P.2d 1047,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 569

(Wyo. 1986).

Power of Commission does not include adjudication of revenueor taxation issues. —

Under the statute assigning administrative authority to the Oil and Gas Conservation Commission, there is no power afforded it to adjudicate revenue or taxation issues. Kerr-Mcgee Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 903 P.2d 537,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For discussion of this section, see 13 Wyo. L.J. 7 (1958).

For article, “The Law of Oil and Gas in Wyoming: An Overview,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1982).

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

§ 30-5-118.
Applicability of act.

The state of Wyoming being a sovereign state and not disposed to jeopardize or surrender any of its sovereign rights, this act shall apply to all lands in the state of Wyoming lawfully subject to its police powers; provided, it shall apply to lands of the United States or to lands subject to the jurisdiction of the United States only to the extent that control and supervision of conservation of oil and gas by the United States on its lands shall fail to effect the intent and purposes of this act and otherwise shall apply to such lands to such extent as an officer of the United States having jurisdiction, or his duly authorized representative, shall approve any of the provisions of this act or the order or orders of the commission which affects such lands; and, furthermore, the same shall apply to any lands committed to a unit agreement approved by the secretary of the interior or his duly authorized representative, except that the commission may, under such unit agreements, suspend the application of this act or any part of this act so long as the conservation of oil and gas and the prevention of waste as in this act provided is accomplished thereby but such suspension shall not relieve any operator from making such reports as are necessary or advised to be fully informed as to operations under such agreements and as the commission may require under this act.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 94, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 30-230.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

30-5-101

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

§ 30-5-119.
Penalties for violation of act, orders of commission; penalties cumulative.

Any person who violates any provision of this act or who after either actual or constructive notice thereof from the commission or its representative violates any rule, regulation, or order of the commission shall forfeit an amount of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for each act of violation, and for each day that such violation continues, to be fixed and determined by the commission after notice and opportunity for hearing. Amounts collected under this subsection shall be paid to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

. Any person who knowingly and willfully violates any provision of this act or who after notice thereof from the commission or its representatives knowingly and willfully violates any rule, regulation, or order of the commission shall be subject to a civil penalty, upon order of the district court of the county in which the defendant resides, or in which any defendant resides if there be more than one (1) defendant, or in the district court of any county in which the violation occurred, or in the district court of Laramie county, Wyoming. The civil penalty shall not exceed the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) for each act of violation and for each day that such violation continues and shall be collected and paid to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

.

Any person who, for the purpose of evading this act or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission shall make or cause to be made any false entry in any report, record, account, or memorandum, required by this act, or by any such rule, regulation, or order, or shall omit, or cause to be omitted, from any such report, record, account, or memorandum, full, true, and correct entries as required by this act, or by any such rule, regulation, or order, or shall remove from this state or destroy, mutilate, alter, or falsify any such record, account, or memorandum, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) or imprisonment for a term not exceeding six (6) months, or to both such fine and imprisonment.

Any person knowingly aiding or abetting any other person in the violation of any provision of this act, or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission shall be subject to the same penalty and punishment as that prescribed by this act for the violation by such other person.

The penalties provided in this section for violations as prescribed herein shall be recoverable by suit filed by the attorney general, in the name and on behalf of the state, in the district court of Laramie county, Wyoming, or the county in which the defendant resides, or in which any defendant resides if there be more than one (1) defendant, or in the district court of any county in which the violation occurred.

Any person or corporation violating the provisions of this article or rules and regulations prescribed pursuant hereto or the lawful orders of the oil and gas supervisor or his assistants or representatives under said rules and regulations shall upon conviction be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or imprisoned not more than six (6) months.

The imposition or payment of any forfeiture or civil penalty as provided in this section shall not bar or affect any other penalty or remedy prescribed in this act or by general law but such forfeiture shall be in addition to any such penalty or other remedy.

The commission may waive any penalty under this section for good cause.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 157, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 78-304; Laws 1933, ch. 81, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 57-1104; W.S. 1957, § 30-231; Laws 1971, ch. 21, § 1; 2005, ch. 19, § 2; ch. 157, § 2.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 19, § 2, effective July 1, 2005, in (a), deleted “to the Wyoming oil and gas conservation fund” following “forfeit,” substituted “five thousand dollars ($5,000.00)” for “five hundred dollars ($500.00),” inserted “and for each day that such violation continues,” deleted “to be remitted and payable into the account of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission fund” following “subject to a civil penalty,” substituted “ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00)” for “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)”; added (g); and made stylistic changes.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 157, § 2 in (a), twice deleted provisions pertaining to payment of penalties to the Wyoming oil and gas conservation fund, twice inserted provisions for payment of penalties to the state treasurer and credit for such as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

, and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2005, ch. 157, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2005.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

30-5-101

.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 5, ch. 157, Laws 1921, repealed all of ch. 274, C.S. 1920.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Law of Oil and Gas in Wyoming: An Overview,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1982).

§ 30-5-120.
Additional forfeiture or civil penalty for flaring of gas in excess of amounts permitted by order of commission.

Whenever under the provisions of W.S.

30-5-119

a forfeiture or civil penalty is imposed for the flaring of gas in excess of the amounts permitted by an order of the commission there shall also be imposed an additional forfeiture or civil penalty which shall be the greater of either (i) ten percent (10%) of the amount of the forfeiture or civil penalty, or (ii) six and one-quarter percent (6 1/4%) of the value of the amount of gas so flared or vented. Value shall be determined by the average price being paid at the nearest point of connection.

Out of said additional forfeiture or civil penalty there shall be paid to the department of revenue of the state of Wyoming an amount equal to the mineral severance tax which would have been payable if the gas had been saved and sold, and the remainder thereof shall be paid to the county treasurer of the county in which said gas was produced in lieu of any taxes which would have been payable to said county if the gas had been saved and sold.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 21, § 2; 1991, ch. 174, § 2; 2011, ch. 176, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

in (a), substituted “W.S.

30-5-119

” for “the preceding section.”

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

§ 30-5-121.
Waste of natural gas prohibited.

The use, consumption, burning or escape into the atmosphere of natural gas taken or drawn from any natural gas well or wells, or borings from which natural gas is produced for the products where such natural gas is burned, consumed or otherwise wasted without the heat therein contained being fully and actually applied and utilized for other manufacturing purposes or domestic purposes is hereby declared to be a wasteful and extravagant use of natural gas and it shall be unlawful to allow or permit such natural gas to pollute or contaminate the atmosphere to such an extent that injury or damage is sustained by growing crops, vegetation, livestock, wildlife, or domestic fowls, or to such an extent that the human health, welfare, or safety is in anywise impaired or damaged.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 125, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4500; R.S. 1931, § 78-201; C.S. 1945, § 57-1105; Laws 1950, Sp. Sess., ch. 9, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 30-232.

Constitutionality. —

Provisions hereof are a legitimate exercise of police power of the state, and not constitutionally objectionable as taking property without due process or as an unreasonable or arbitrary discrimination. Walls v. Midland Carbon Co., 254 U.S. 300, 41 S. Ct. 118, 65 L. Ed. 276, 1920 U.S. LEXIS 1160 (U.S. 1920).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Implied duty of oil and gas lessee to protect against drainage, 18 ALR4th 14.

Remedy for breach of implied duty of oil and gas lessee to protect against drainage, 18 ALR4th 147.

§ 30-5-122.
Sale of natural gas for wasteful purposes prohibited.

No person, firm or corporation, having the possession or control of any natural gas well or wells, except as herein provided, or borings from which natural gas is produced, whether as a contractor, owner, lessee, agent or manager, shall use, sell, or otherwise dispose of natural gas, the product of any such well or wells, or borings for the purpose of manufacturing or producing carbon or other resultant products from the burning or consumption of such natural gas, without the heat therein contained being fully and actually applied and utilized for other manufacturing purposes or domestic purposes.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 125, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 4501; R.S. 1931, § 78-202; C.S. 1945, § 57-1106; W.S. 1957, § 30-233.

Cited

in

Walls v. Midland Carbon Co., 254 U.S. 300, 41 S. Ct. 118, 65 L. Ed. 276, 1920 U.S. LEXIS 1160 (1920).

§ 30-5-123.
Penalty for violation of sections 30-5-121 and 30-5-122.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any of the provisions of this act [§§

30-5-121

through

30-5-123

] shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for each offense and each and every day in which any person, firm or corporation shall violate any of the provisions hereof shall constitute a separate offense hereunder and subject the offender to the penalty hereby provided.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 125, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 4502; R.S. 1931, § 78-203; C.S. 1945, § 57-1107; W.S. 1957, § 30-234.

Cited

in

Walls v. Midland Carbon Co., 254 U.S. 300, 41 S. Ct. 118, 65 L. Ed. 276, 1920 U.S. LEXIS 1160 (1920).

§ 30-5-124.
Purchase or taking ratably oil and gas for transportation without discrimination in favor of any owner or producer; oil.

Each person now or hereafter purchasing or taking for transportation oil from any owner or producer, shall purchase or take ratably without discrimination in favor of any owner or producer over any other owner or producer in the same pool offering to sell his oil produced therefrom to such person. If any such person purchasing or taking for transportation oil shall not have need for all such oil lawfully produced within a pool, or if for any reason it shall be unable to purchase all of such oil, then it shall purchase from each producer in a pool ratably, taking and purchasing the same quantity of oil from each well to the extent that each well is capable of producing its ratable portion; without waste, provided however, nothing herein contained shall be construed to require more than one (1) pipeline connection for each producing well. In the event that any such purchaser or person taking oil for transportation is likewise a producer or owner, he is hereby prohibited from discriminating in favor of his own production, or production in which he may be interested, and his own production shall be treated as that of any other producer or owner.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 171, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

The second sentence of this section is set out herein just as it appears in the published laws.

§ 30-5-125.
Purchase or taking ratably oil and gas for transportation without discrimination in favor of any owner or producer; gas.

Each person now or hereafter purchasing or taking for transportation gas produced from gas wells or from oil wells from any owner or producer shall purchase or take ratably without discrimination in favor of any owner or producer, over any other owner or producer in a pool. Such person shall not discriminate in the quantities purchased, the basis of measurement, or the gas transportation facilities afforded for gas of like quantity, quality, and pressure available from such wells. For the purpose of this act [§§

30-5-124

through

30-5-126

] reasonable differences in quantity taken or facilities afforded shall not constitute unreasonable discrimination if such differences bear a fair relationship to differences in quality, quantity, or pressure of the gas available or to the acreage attributable to the well, market requirements, or to the relative lengths of time during which such gas will be available to the purchaser. In the event any such purchaser or person taking gas for transportation is likewise a producer or owner, he is hereby prohibited from discriminating in favor of his own production or production in which he may be interested, and his own production shall be treated as that of any other producer or owner producing from gas wells in the same pool.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 171, § 2; 1971, ch. 11, § 6.

§ 30-5-126.
Purchase or taking ratably oil and gas for transportation without discrimination in favor of any owner or producer; oil and gas conservation commission to administer.

In addition to the powers and authority, either expressed or implied, granted to the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission, by virtue of the statutes of the state of Wyoming, the commission is hereby authorized and empowered to administer and enforce the provisions of this act, in the same manner and in accordance with the same procedures provided by W.S.

30-5-101

through

30-5-119

, as amended for the enforcement and violations of rules, regulations and orders of the commission.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 171, § 3; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “W.S.

30-5-101

through

30-5-119

” for “sections 30-216 to 30-231, Wyoming Statutes 1957.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” refer to Laws 1967, ch. 171, §§ 1 through 3, compiled (as amended) as §§

30-5-124

through

30-5-126

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 30-5-127.
Payment of penalties.

Unless otherwise provided by law, all civil or administrative fines or penalties collected under this article shall be paid over to the state treasurer to be credited to the public school fund of the county in which the violation for which the fine or penalty was imposed occurred.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 19, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 19, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 30-5-128.
Unitization of areas to restore or enhance the microbial conversion of hydrocarbon substrates to methane gas; purposes; application; contents.

Any interested person may file an application with the commission requesting an order authorizing well and reservoir injections to restore or enhance the microbial conversion of hydrocarbon substrates to methane gas. The application may be on an individual lease or drilling and spacing unit basis or, at the applicant’s election, on a unit basis pursuant to W.S.

30-5-109

and

30-5-110

. If the application is on a unit basis, the applicant shall provide for the operation and organization of a unit or units of the optimal size and shape necessary to prevent waste and protect correlative rights and shall provide for the pooling of interests in a specific geologic formation in the proposed unit area for the purpose of conducting the injections. The application shall contain all of the elements set forth in W.S.

30-5-110

(c) through (g). The application shall demonstrate that the applicant has a legally binding commitment to plug and abandon all wells not later than sixty (60) days prior to their intersection with an active surface or conventional underground coal mine. Injections authorized by this section shall not be deemed in situ mining as defined in W.S. 35-11-103(f)(iv).

Applications under this section shall contain the following with respect to the proposed operating plan:

Evidence that groundwater in the proposed formation intervals will not be adversely influenced by the injections and that the operations shall at all times be in compliance with applicable groundwater quality regulations and underground injection control program requirements. An applicant shall comply with this paragraph by:

Obtaining from the commission, after the commission has adopted class II rules implementing this section and after providing notice of the application to all groundwater permit holders within one-half (1/2) mile of each injection well or the area of review, whichever is larger, a class II well permit demonstrating that the groundwater will not be degraded and will be in compliance with the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, and that for each injection zone the underground ambient water quality class of use as defined by the department of environmental quality will not be violated by the injections; or

Obtaining a class V well permit from the Wyoming department of environmental quality.

Upon the filing of an application under this section, the commission shall promptly set the matter for hearing. In addition to any notice required by law or commission rules, the commission shall give notice of the hearing by certified mail to all persons owning or having an interest in coal or its production in the proposed application area. The notice shall be mailed at least thirty (30) days before the hearing, shall specify the time and place of hearing and shall describe briefly the purpose of the hearing and the land affected.

Following the hearing, the commission shall enter an order setting forth findings and approving the application if the commission finds that the provisions of W.S.

30-5-109

or

30-5-110

have been met.

The commission, after consultation with the director of the department of environmental quality, shall adopt class II rules implementing this section.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 50, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 50, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2011.